West Virginia, session 2025, HB3387.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. State Board of Education. §18-2-5i. Regional school district pilot program; enactment; rulemaking. (a) Legislative findings – The Legislature finds that certain county school districts across West Virginia face challenges related to accessibility, funding, population, operational efficiency and topography. In many cases, the challenges county school districts face is shared by bordering county school districts. With this knowledge, the Legislature recognizes the need to:(1) Unify and consolidate county school districts when necessary;(2) Plan for benefits and detriments that may come with unifying and consolidating county school districts; and(3) Determine issues that smaller or rural counties are dealing with that are not being adequately addressed by a county board of education.(b) Enactment. – (1) The Legislature finds that the State Board of Education may implement a pilot program and form regional school districts to address ongoing issues shared among neighboring counties.(2) Effective July 1, 2025, at the discretion of the State Board of Education, the initial pilot program may begin.  (3) Regional school districts may consolidate schools, make financial decisions, and otherwise hold the same powers otherwise provided to county boards of education.(4) The decision of the leadership of the regional school districts shall supersede any decisions made by the county board of education within the regional district.(c) Rulemaking. – The State Board of Education is authorized to submit rules for legislative consideration pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to determine legislative changes required to aid in the orderly and efficient process during the regional school district unification process and during the phase-out period prior to the termination of the county school districts.